Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2113
Purchaser's remedies; attorney's fees and court costs.

A purchaser's remedy for errors in or omissions from the membership camping contract, the materials delivered to the purchaser at the time of sale, or any of the disclosures required in section 76-2117 shall be limited to a right of cancellation and refund of the payment made or consideration given by the purchaser, except that such limitation shall not apply to errors or omissions from the contract or disclosures or other requirements of the Membership Campground Act which are part of a scheme to willfully misstate or omit the information required. Reasonable attorney's fees and court costs shall be awarded to the prevailing party in any action under this section.

Laws 1990, LB 656, § 13.